Tennessee, session 114, SB0298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1026(b), is amended by
deleting the word "curriculum" and substituting the word "course".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1026(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting the following:
(c)
(1) Any course for an academic study of the Bible using a curriculum and
instructional materials developed by an LEA or a public charter school must be
approved by the local board of education or the public charter school governing
body and comply with subsection (a).
(2) The department of education shall make available on its website:
(A) A list identifying each LEA or public charter school that offers
a Bible course approved pursuant to subdivision (c)(1); and
(B) The academic standards for a Bible course that have been
approved by the state board of education under subsection (a).
(3) Each LEA and public charter school shall make available on its
website all Bible course curricula, including a list of instructional materials,
developed by the LEA or public charter school that have been approved by the
local board of education or public charter school governing body.
SB0298
001623
- 1 -

(4) The state board of education shall include in its list of approved high
school courses an elective Bible course developed pursuant to this section.
(5) The department shall notify each LEA and public charter school in
writing, no later than July 1 of each year, of the LEA's or public charter school's
ability to offer an elective state-funded Bible course consisting of a nonsectarian,
nonreligious academic study of the Bible in accordance with this section, and the
ability of an LEA or public charter school to develop its own Bible course
curriculum.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1026, is amended by adding
the language "or public charter school" immediately following the language "LEA" wherever it
appears in subsections (d) and (e).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2025-2026 school year and subsequent school years.
- 2 - 001623